North Dakota, session 69, HB1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12-59-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12-59-15. Breach of parole - Hearings - Order of recommitment.
1. When it is alleged that a parolee has violated any of the terms or conditions of parole
established by the parole board or by the department of corrections and rehabilitation, the
director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may issue a warrant for the arrest
of the parolee.
2. Upon issuance of a warrant of arrest for a parole violation, the running of the time period of
parole must be suspended until the parole board issues a final order under this section. The
parolee is entitled to credit for time spent in physical custody from the time of arrest until the
time the parole board issues a final order.
3. The parolee is entitled to a preliminary hearing, as promptly as is convenient after the arrest
and reasonably near the place of the alleged violation or arrest, to determine whether there is
probable cause to find that the parolee violated any of the terms and conditions of parole
established by the board or by the department of corrections and rehabilitation.
4. The preliminary hearing must be conducted before the director of the department of
corrections and rehabilitation or other hearing officer authorized by the director. The
preliminary hearing must be conducted by a disinterested hearing officer not directly involved
in the supervision of the parolee or by the person bringing the allegation of a parole violation.
5. If the hearing officer determines there is probable cause to find that the parolee has violated
any of the terms and conditions of parole established by the board or by the department of
corrections and rehabilitation, the board may redetermine the time remaining in the period of
parole to reflect any portion of the period during which the parolee was not under supervision
or not in the custody of law enforcement personnel in the state.
6. If the hearing officer determines there is probable cause to find that the parolee has violated
any of the terms and conditions of parole established by the board or by the department of
corrections and rehabilitation, the parolee must be returned to the physical custody of the
department of corrections and rehabilitation, transferred to another correctional facility or the
state hospital, or released from actual custody pursuant to such terms and conditions as may
be established by the parole board or the department of corrections and rehabilitation,
pending a final revocation hearing before the parole board. If the board determines at the final
revocation hearing that the parolee has violated any of the terms and conditions of parole
established by the board or by the department of corrections and rehabilitation, itthe board
may order that the parolee be recommitted to the physical custody of the department of
corrections and rehabilitation to serve all or part of the remaining time of the sentence that has
not been served in custody.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 2
7. At any hearing pursuant to this section a record must be made and the parolee shall have:
a. Written notice of the purpose of the hearing and the alleged violations.
b. The opportunity to be heard in person and present witnesses and documentary evidence.
c. The opportunity to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, unless the hearing
officer determines that confrontation would create a risk of harm to the witness.
d. A written statement as to the reasons for the decision.
8. WhenIf the board determines the parolee has absconded , as defined in section 12.1 - 01 - 04 ,
from supervision, the board may order the parolee to pay the costs of being returned to the
board. Moneys recovered under this subsection must be remitted to the department of
corrections and rehabilitation.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-01-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-01-04. General definitions.
As used in this title, unless a different meaning plainly is required:
1. "Absconded" means when a probationer, parolee, participant in a pretrial services program, or
participant in a prosecution-led diversion program willfully avoids supervision by making their
whereabouts unknown or fails to report to a supervising authority.
2. "Act" or "action" means a bodily movement, whether voluntary or involuntary.
2.3. "Acted", "acts", and "actions" include, where relevant, "omitted to act" and "omissions to act".
3.4. "Actor" includes, where relevant, a person guilty of an omission.
4.5. "Bodily injury" means any impairment of physical condition, including physical pain.
5.6. "Court" means any of the following courts: the supreme court, a district court, and where
relevant, a municipal court.
6.7. "Dangerous weapon" includes any switchblade or gravity knife, machete, scimitar, stiletto,
sword, or dagger; any billy, blackjack, sap, bludgeon, cudgel, metal knuckles, or sand club;
any slingshot; any bow and arrow, crossbow, or spear; any weapon that will expel, or is readily
capable of expelling, a projectile by the action of a spring, compressed air, or compressed gas
including any such weapon, loaded or unloaded, commonly referred to as a BB gun, air rifle,
or CO CO2 gun; and any projector of a bomb or any object containing or capable of producing
2
and emitting any noxious liquid, gas, or substance.
7.8. "Destructive device" means any explosive, incendiary or poison gas bomb, grenade, mine,
rocket, missile, or similar device.
8.9. "Explosive" means gunpowders, powders used for blasting, all forms of high explosives,
blasting materials, fuses (other than electric circuit breakers), detonators and other detonating
agents, smokeless powders, and any chemical compounds, mechanical mixture, or other
ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that ignition by fire, by friction, by
concussion, by percussion, or by detonation of the compound, or material, or any part thereof
may cause an explosion.
9.10. "Firearm" means any weapon that will expel, or is readily capable of expelling, a projectile by
the action of an explosive and includes any such weapon, loaded or unloaded, commonly
referred to as a pistol, revolver, rifle, gun, machine gun, shotgun, bazooka, or cannon.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 3
10.11. "Force" means physical action.
11.12. "Government" means:
a. The government of this state or any political subdivision of this state;
b. Any agency, subdivision, or department of the state or any political subdivision of the
state, including the executive, legislative, and judicial branches;
c. Any corporation or other entity established by law to carry on any governmental function;
and
d. Any commission, corporation, or agency established by statute, compact, or contract
between or among governments for the execution of intergovernmental programs.
12.13. "Governmental function" includes any activity that one or more public servants are legally
authorized to undertake on behalf of government.
13.14. "Harm" means loss, disadvantage, or injury to the person affected, and includes loss,
disadvantage, or injury to any other person in whose welfare the person affected is interested.
14.15. "Included offense" means an offense:
a. That is established by proof of the same or less than all the facts required to establish
commission of the offense charged;
b. That consists of criminal facilitation of or an attempt or solicitation to commit the offense
charged; or
c. That differed from the offense charged only in that it constitutes a less serious harm or
risk of harm to the same person, property, or public interest, or because a lesser degree
of culpability suffices to establish its commission.
15.16. "Includes" should be read as if the phrase "but is not limited to" were also set forth.
16.17. "Law enforcement officer" or "peace officer" means a public servant authorized by law or by a
government agency or branch to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations or
prosecutions for violations of law.
17.18. "Local" means of or pertaining to any political subdivision of the state.
18.19. "Manifest injustice" means a specific finding by the court that the imposition of sentence is
unreasonably harsh or shocking to the conscience of a reasonable individual, with due
consideration of the totality of circumstances.
19.20. "Offense" means conduct for which a term of imprisonment or a fine is authorized by statute
after conviction.
20.21. "Official action" includes a decision, opinion, recommendation, vote, or other exercise of
discretion by any government agency.
21.22. "Official proceeding" means a proceeding heard or which may be heard before any
government agency or branch or public servant authorized to take evidence under oath,
including any referee, hearing examiner, commissioner, notary, or other person taking
testimony or a deposition in connection with any such proceeding.
22.23. "Omission" means a failure to act.
23.24. As used in this title and in sections outside this title which define offenses, "person" includes,
where relevant, a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, unincorporated

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 4
association, or other legal entity. When used to designate a party whose property may be the
subject of action constituting an offense, the word "person" includes a government that may
lawfully own property in this state.
24.25. "Political subdivision" as used in this title and in any statute outside this title which defines an
offense means a county, city, school district, township, and any other local governmental entity
created by law.
25.26. "Possesses" means an individual has:
a. Direct physical control of something on or around the individual's person; or
b. The power and intention to exercise control over something accessible to but not on or
around the individual's person.
26.27. "Public servant" as used in this title and in any statute outside this title which defines an
offense means any officer or employee of government, including law enforcement officers,
whether elected or appointed, and any person participating in the performance of a
governmental function. The term does not include witnesses.
27.28. "Responsivity factors" means characteristics of an individual which affect the individual's ability
to respond favorably or unfavorably to a treatment goal.
29. "Risk assessment" means an initial phase with a secondary process approved by the
department of health and human services for the evaluation of the likelihood a person that
committed an offense will commit another similar offensea validated, standardized actuarial
tool used to identify potential risk factors that increase the likelihood an individual will reoffend
and responsivity factors that, when addressed, reduce the likelihood an individual will
reoffend. The initial phase is an assessment tool that is administered by a trained probation
and parole officercorrections professional. A predetermined score on the initial phase initiates
the secondary process, approved by the department of health and human services, that
includesmay include a clinical interview, psychological testing, and verification through
collateral information or psychophysiological testing, or both. The department of health and
human services shall perform the secondary process of the risk assessment.
28.30. "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury that creates a substantial risk of death or which
causes serious permanent disfigurement, unconsciousness, extreme pain, permanent loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ, a bone fracture, or impediment of
air flow or blood flow to the brain or lungs.
29.31. "Signature" includes any name, mark, or sign written or affixed with intent to authenticate any
instrument or writing.
30.32. "Substantial bodily injury" means a substantial temporary disfigurement, loss, or impairment of
the function of any bodily member or organ.
31.33. "Thing of value" or "thing of pecuniary value" means a thing of value in the form of money,
tangible or intangible property, commercial interests, or anything else the primary significance
of which is economic gain to the recipient.
32.34. "Tier 1 mental health professional" has the same meaning as provided under section
25-01-01.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 3 of section 12.1-22-01 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
b. "Dangerous weapon" means a weapon defined in subsection 6 of section 12.1-01-04 or a
weapon the possession of which under the circumstances indicates an intent or
readiness to inflict serious bodily injury.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 5
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-32-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-32-07. Supervision of probationer - Conditions of probation - Revocation.
1. When the court imposes probation upon conviction for a felony offense subject to section
12.1-32-09.1 or 12.1-32-02.1, a second or subsequent violation of section 12.1-17-07.1, a
second or subsequent violation of any domestic violence protection order, a violation of
chapter 12.1-41, a violation of section 14-09-22, or a felony offense under chapter 39-08, the
court shall place the defendant under the supervision and management of the department of
corrections and rehabilitation. When the court imposes probation upon conviction or order of
disposition in all other felony cases, the court may place the defendant under the supervision
and management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. In class A misdemeanor
cases, the court may place the defendant under the supervision and management of the
department of corrections and rehabilitation or other responsible party. In all other cases, the
court may place the defendant under the supervision and management of a community
corrections program other than the department of corrections and rehabilitation. A community
corrections program means a program for the supervision of a defendant, including monitoring
and enforcement of terms and conditions of probation set by the court.
2. The conditions of probation must be such as the court in its discretion deems reasonably
necessary to ensure that the defendant will lead a law-abiding life or to assist the defendant to
do so. The court shall provide as an explicit condition of every probation that the defendant not
commit another offense during the period for which the probation remains subject to
revocation. The court shall order supervision costs and fees of not less than fifty-five dollars
per month unless the court makes a specific finding on record that the imposition of fees will
result in an undue hardship. If the offender has not paid the full amount of supervision fees
and costs before completion or termination of probation, the court may issue an order, after
opportunity for hearing, to determine the amount of supervision fees and costs that are
unpaid. The order may be filed, transcribed, and enforced by the department of corrections
and rehabilitation in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by a district court of this
stateThe department of corrections and rehabilitation may administer a risk assessment for
the evaluation of each defendant placed under the supervision and management of the
department of corrections and rehabilitation. The results of the risk assessment may be used
to set a level of supervision and management and develop an individualized case plan for the
defendant. The case plan may include a list of responsivity factors and a plan to address any
risk factors identified in the risk assessment.
3. The court shall provide as an explicit condition of every probation that the defendant may not
possess a firearm, destructive device, or other dangerous weapon while the defendant is on
probation. Except when the offense is a misdemeanor offense under section 12.1-17-01,
12.1-17-01.1, 12.1-17-01.2, 12.1-17-05, or 12.1-17-07.1, or chapter 14-07.1, the court may
waive this condition of probation if the defendant has pled guilty to, or has been found guilty
of, a misdemeanor or infraction offense, the misdemeanor or infraction is the defendant's first
offense, and the court has made a specific finding on the record before imposition of a
sentence or a probation that there is good cause to waive the condition. The court may not
waive this condition of probation if the court places the defendant under the supervision and
management of the department of corrections and rehabilitation. The court shall provide as an
explicit condition of probation that the defendant may not willfully defraud a urine test
administered as a condition of probation. Unless waived on the record by the court, the court
shall also provide as a condition of probation that the defendant undergo various agreed-to
community constraints and conditions as intermediate measures of the department of
corrections and rehabilitation to avoid revocation, which may include:
a. Community service;
b. Day reporting;

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 6
c. Curfew;
d. Home confinement;
e. House arrest;
f. Electronic monitoring;
g. Residential halfway house;
h. Intensive supervision program;
i. Up to five nonsuccessive periods of incarceration during any twelve-month period, each
of which may not exceed forty-eight consecutive hours;
j. Participation in the twenty-four seven sobriety program; or
k. One period of incarceration during a period of probation not to exceed thirty consecutive
days in lieu of a petition for revocation of probation.
4. When imposing a sentence to probation, probation in conjunction with imprisonment, or
probation in conjunction with suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence, the
court may impose such conditions as it deems appropriate and may include any one or more
of the following:
a. Work faithfully at a suitable employment or faithfully pursue a course of study or of career
and technical education training that will equip the defendant for suitable employment.
b. Undergo available medical or psychiatric treatment and remain in a specified institution if
required for that purpose.
c. Attend or reside in a facility established for the instruction, recreation, or residence of
persons on probation.
d. Support the defendant's dependents and meet other family responsibilities.
e. Make restitution or reparation to the victim of the defendant's conduct for the damage or
injury which was sustained or perform other reasonable assigned work. When restitution,
reparation, or assigned work is a condition of probation, the court shall proceed as
provided in subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, of section 12.1-32-08.
f. Pay a fine imposed after consideration of the provisions of section 12.1-32-05.
g. Refrain from excessive use of alcohol or any use of narcotics or of another dangerous or
abusable drug without a prescription.
h. Permit the probation officer to visit the defendant at reasonable times at the defendant's
home or elsewhere.
i. Remain within the jurisdiction of the court, unless granted permission to leave by the
court or the probation officer.
j. Answer all reasonable inquiries by the probation officer and promptly notify the probation
officer of any change in address or employment.
k. Report to a probation officer at reasonable times as directed by the court or the probation
officer.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 7
l. Submit to a medical examination or other reasonable testing for the purpose of
determining the defendant's use of narcotics, marijuana, or other controlled substance
whenever required by a probation officer.
m. Refrain from associating with known users or traffickers in narcotics, marijuana, or other
controlled substances.
n. Submit the defendant's person, place of residence, or vehicle to search and seizure by a
probation officer at any time of the day or night, with or without a search warrant.
o. Serve a term of imprisonment of up to one-half of the maximum term authorized for the
offense of which the defendant was convicted.
p. Reimburse the costs and expenses determined necessary for the defendant's adequate
defense when counsel is appointed or provided at public expense for the defendant.
When reimbursement of indigent defense costs and expenses is imposed as a condition
of probation, the court shall proceed as provided in subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-08.
q. Provide community service for the number of hours designated by the court.
r. Refrain from any subscription to, access to, or use of the internet.
5. When the court imposes a sentence to probation, probation in conjunction with imprisonment,
or probation in conjunction with suspended execution or deferred imposition of sentence, the
defendant must be given a certificate explicitly setting forth the conditions on which the
defendant is being released.
6. The court, upon notice to the probationer and with good cause, may modify or enlarge the
conditions of probation at any time before the expiration or termination of the period for which
the probation remains conditional. If the defendant violates a condition of probation at any time
before the expiration or termination of the period, the court may continue the defendant on the
existing probation, with or without modifying or enlarging the conditions, or may revoke the
probation and impose any other sentence that was available under section 12.1-32-02 or
12.1-32-09 at the time of initial sentencing or deferment.
7. The court may continue or modify probation conditions or revoke probation for a violation of
probation conditions occurring before the expiration or termination of the period of probation
notwithstanding that the order of the court is imposed after the expiration or termination has
occurred. The petition for revocation must be issued within sixty days of the expiration or
termination of probation.
8. Jurisdiction over a probationer may be transferred from the court that imposed the sentence to
another court of this state with the concurrence of both courts. Retransfers of jurisdiction may
also occur in the same manner. The court to which jurisdiction has been transferred under this
subsection may exercise all powers permissible under this chapter over the defendant.
9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court may authorize the defendant to assist
law enforcement officers in an investigation of a criminal offense upon the terms and
conditions as the court may require by written order. The court shall hold a hearing in camera
before issuing an order under this subsection. The order must be sealed and is subject to
inspection only upon order of the court.
10. The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall provide written notice to a defendant
who is in the department's physical custody of any untried petition for revocation against the
defendant of which the department has notice and of the defendant's right to make a request
for final disposition of the petition.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 8
a. Upon notice of an untried petition for revocation of probation, the defendant may request
final disposition of the petition. The defendant's request must be in writing and name the
court in which the petition for revocation of probation is pending and the prosecuting
official charged with the duty of prosecuting the petition.
b. The defendant shall submit the request to the department. The department shall certify
the term of commitment under which the defendant is being held, the time the defendant
has served on the sentence, the time remaining to be served, sentence reduction credit
the defendant has earned, the defendant's eligibility for parole, and whether the parole
board has made a decision regarding the defendant's parole.
c. The department shall send by registered mail, return receipt requested, one copy of the
request and certificate to the court and one copy to the prosecuting official to whom the
request and certificate is addressed.
d. The petition for revocation of probation must be brought to the court for hearing within
ninety days after the receipt of the request and certificate by the court and prosecuting
official. If the petition is not brought to the court for hearing within the ninety days, the
court shall dismiss the petition with prejudice.
e. The parties may stipulate for a continuance or the court may grant a continuance upon a
showing of good cause by either party for a petition under this subsection.
f. If the defendant escapes from custody subsequent to the defendant's execution of a
request for final disposition of a petition for revocation, the request is considered void.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-32-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-32-08. Hearing prior to ordering restitution, reparation, or reimbursement of indigent
defense costs and expenses - Conditions - Collection of restitution for insufficient funds
checks - Continuing appropriation.
1. The court, when sentencing a person adjudged guilty of criminal activities that have resulted in
pecuniary damages, in addition to any other sentence the court may impose, shall order that
the defendant make restitution to the victim or other recipient as determined by the court.
Restitution must include payment to the owner of real property that is contaminated by the
defendant in the manufacturing of methamphetamine for the cost of removing the
contamination and returning the property to the property's condition before contamination and
to any other person that has incurred costs in decontaminating the property.
2. If the court has retained jurisdiction after the sentencing hearing for claims of restitution, to
make a claim for restitution, the victim shall submit information by affidavit or declaration and,
as applicable, documentary evidence within the time specified in the order. The information
submitted must describe the items or elements of loss, itemize the total dollar amounts of
restitution claimed, and present facts and evidence sufficient to support a finding the
restitution is directly related to the offense and the amount awarded. The prosecutor shall
serve the defendant with a copy of the information submitted by the victim no later than sixty
days following sentencing.
3. The defendant may challenge restitution but must do so by requesting a hearing within thirty
days of being served with the written notification of the amount of restitution requested. The
hearing request must be made in writing and filed with the court. If no hearing is requested,
the court may enter a judgment ordering restitution. A defendant may not challenge restitution
after the thirty-day time period has passed.
4. In determining the amount of restitution, the court shall take into account the reasonable
damages sustained by the victim or victims of the criminal offense, which damages are limited

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 9
to those directly related to the criminal offense and expenses actually sustained as a direct
result of the defendant's criminal action. This can include an amount equal to the cost of
necessary and related professional services and devices relating to physical, psychiatric, and
psychological care. The defendant may be required as part of the sentence imposed by the
court to pay the prescribed treatment costs for a victim of a sexual offense as defined in
chapters 12.1-20 and 12.1-27.2. The court shall fix the amount of restitution or reparation and
shall fix the manner of performance of any condition or conditions of probation established
pursuant to this subsection. The court may order the defendant to disclose income and assets
on forms developed by the state court administrator to facilitate the setting of an appropriate
payment plan. The court shall order restitution be paid to the division of adult services for any
benefits the division has paid or may pay to the victim under chapter 54-23.4 unless the court,
on the record, directs otherwise. Any payments made pursuant to the order must be deducted
from damages awarded in a civil action arising from the same incident.
5. An order that a defendant make restitution or reparation as a sentence or condition of
probation, unless the court directs otherwise, may be filed without filing fee, transcribed, and
enforced by the person entitled to the restitution or reparation or by the division of adult
services in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by the courts of this state may be
enforced. Upon thirty days' written notice to the victim's last known address, the court may
order the judgment imposing a duty to pay restitution or reparation be docketed in the same
manner as a civil judgment under section 29-26-22.1.
6. When the restitution ordered by the court under subsection 1 is the result of a finding that the
defendant issued a check or draft without sufficient funds or without an account, the court shall
impose as costs the greater of the sum of ten dollars or an amount equal to twenty-five
percent of the amount of restitution ordered. The costs imposed under this subsection,
however, may not exceed one thousand dollars. The state-employed clerks of district court
shall remit the funds collected as costs under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit
in the restitution collection assistance fund. The funds deposited into the restitution collection
assistance fund are appropriated to the judicial branch on a continuing basis for the purpose
of defraying expenses incident to the collection of restitution, including operating expenses
and the compensation of additional necessary personnel. The state's attorneys and
county-employed clerks of district court shall remit the funds collected as costs under this
subsection to the county treasurer to be deposited in the county general fund.
7. The court may order the defendant to perform reasonable assigned work as a condition of
probation, which assigned work need not be related to the offense charged, but must not be
solely for the benefit of a private individual other than the victim.
8. Under section 12.1-32-07, the court may order that the defendant reimburse indigent defense
costs and expenses as a condition of probation.
a. Unless it finds that there is no likelihood that the defendant is or will be able to pay
attorney's fees and expenses, the court, in its judgment of conviction, and in any order or
amended judgment following a revocation or other postjudgment proceeding, shall notify
the defendant, the defendant's probation officer, and the prosecuting attorney of the
presumed amount of costs and expenses to be reimbursed, as determined by the
commission on legal counsel for indigents, and of the right to a hearing on the
reimbursement amount. The reimbursement amount must include an application fee
imposed under section 29-07-01.1 if the fee has not been paid before disposition of the
case and the court has not waived payment of the fee.
b. If the defendant or prosecutor requests a hearing within thirty days of receiving notice
under this subdivision, the court shall schedule a hearing at which the actual amount of
attorney's fees and expenses must be shown. In determining the amount and method of
reimbursement, the court shall consider the financial resources of the defendant and the
nature of the burden that reimbursement of costs and expenses will impose.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 10
c. A defendant who is required to reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses as a
condition of probation and who is not willfully in default in that reimbursement may at any
time petition the court that imposed the condition to waive reimbursement of all or any
portion of the costs and expenses. If the court is satisfied that reimbursement of the
amount due will impose undue hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate
family, the court may waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the amount due or
modify the method of payment.
d. If at any time the court finds that the defendant is able to reimburse costs and expenses
and has willfully failed to do so, the court may continue, modify, or enlarge the conditions
of probation or revoke probation as provided in subsection 6 or 7, as applicable, of
section 12.1-32-07.
9. If the court finds that the defendant is unable to pay a fine, supervision fee, reimbursement for
indigent defense costs and expenses, or restitution or reparations, the court may order the
defendant to perform reasonable assigned work in lieu of all or part of a fine, a supervision
fee, reimbursement for indigent defense costs and expenses, or restitution or reparations. The
defendant may not perform reasonable assigned work in lieu of restitution or reparations
unless the person entitled to restitution or reparations has consented in writing or on the
record.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 29-07-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
29-07-01.1. Payment of expenses for defense of indigents - Reimbursement of indigent
defense costs and expenses - Indigent defense administration fund - Continuing appropriation.
1. Lawyers provided to represent indigent persons must be compensated at a reasonable rate to
be determined by the commission on legal counsel for indigents. Expenses necessary for the
adequate defense of an indigent person prosecuted in district court, other than for a violation
of a home rule county's ordinance, when approved by the commission, must be paid by the
state. Expenses necessary for the adequate defense of an indigent person prosecuted for
violation of a home rule county's ordinance must be paid by the home rule county. Expenses
necessary for the adequate defense of an indigent person prosecuted in municipal court,
when approved by the judge, must be paid by the city in which the alleged offense took place.
The city shall also pay the expenses in any matter transferred to district court pursuant to
section 40-18-06.2 or 40-18-15.1, in any appeal taken to district court from a judgment of
conviction in municipal court pursuant to section 40-18-19, and in an appeal or postconviction
matter seeking relief from a conviction resulting from violation of a municipal ordinance. A
defendant requesting representation by counsel at public expense, or for whom counsel
provided at public expense without a request is considered appropriate by the court, shall
submit an application for indigent defense services. For an application for indigent defense
services in the district court, a nonrefundable application fee of thirty-five dollars must be paid
at the time the application is submitted. The district court may extend the time for payment of
the fee or may waive or reduce the fee if the court determines the defendant is financially
unable to pay all or part of the fee. If the application fee is not paid before disposition of the
case, the fee amount must be added to the amount to be reimbursed under this section.
Application fees collected under this subsection must be forwarded for deposit in the indigent
defense administration fund established under subsection 4.
2. A defendant for whom counsel is provided at public expense, subject to this subsection, shall
reimburse the state, home rule county, or city such sums as the state, home rule county, or
city expends on the defendant's behalf.
a. At the time counsel is provided for a defendant, the court shall advise the defendant of
the defendant's potential obligation to reimburse the appropriate governmental entity the
amounts expended on behalf of the defendant.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 11
b. Unless it finds that there is no likelihood that the defendant is or will be able to pay
attorney's fees and expenses, the court, in its judgment of conviction, and in any order or
amended judgment entered following a revocation or other postjudgment proceeding,
shall order the defendant to reimburse the presumed amount of indigent defense costs
and expenses, as determined by the commission, and shall notify the defendant of the
right to a hearing on the reimbursement amount. If the defendant or prosecutor requests
a hearing within thirty days of receiving notice under this subdivision, the court shall
schedule a hearing at which the actual amount of attorney's fees and expenses must be
shown. In determining the amount of reimbursement and method of payment, the court
shall consider the financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that
reimbursement of costs and expenses will impose.
c. A defendant who is required to reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses and who
is not willfully in default in that reimbursement may at any time petition the court to waive
reimbursement of all or any portion of the attorney's fees and expenses. If the court is
satisfied that reimbursement of the amount due will impose undue hardship on the
defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may waive reimbursement of all
or any portion of the amount due or modify the method of payment.
3. The attorney general, the state's attorney of the home rule county, or the prosecuting attorney
of the city in which the alleged offense took place, if reimbursement has not been received,
shall seek civil recovery of any amounts expended on the defendant's behalf anytime the
attorney general, state's attorney, or city attorney determines the person for whom counsel
was appointed may have funds to repay the state, home rule county, or city within six years of
the date such amount was paid on that person's behalf. A person against whom civil recovery
is sought under this subsection is entitled to all exemptions accorded to other judgment
debtors. The attorney general, state's attorney, or prosecuting attorney may contract with a
private sector collection agency for assistance in seeking recovery of such funds. Before
referring the matter to a collection agency, the state's attorney shall notify the person who is
the subject of the collection action.
4. The indigent defense administration fund is a special fund in the state treasury. The state
treasurer shall deposit in the fund all application fees collected under subsection 1. All moneys
in the indigent defense administration fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the
commission on legal counsel for indigents to be used in the administration of the indigent
defense system.
SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - COURT FINES AND FEES. During the
2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying court fines and fees, including
fines and fees relating to travel permits, presentence investigations, the drug court program, electronic
monitoring, alcohol monitoring, and the twenty-four seven sobriety program. The study must consider
the total amount collected; rate of fees collected, including any money expended to collect the fines and
fees; an evaluation of practices in other states; and the overall impacts on a defendant. The legislative
management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to
implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1417 - PAGE 12
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1417.
House Vote: Yeas 73 Nays 20 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 7 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State